Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0087.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 804. The commission shall suspend the license of a retailer for 14 days if the retailer has made 6 or more payments to a wholesaler that have been dishonored by a financial institution in violation of section 903b on different dates in 12 consecutive months.